Hawaii statutes.
§445-30 Record books. Every auctioneer
shall keep and preserve a record book in which shall be entered:

(1) A detailed list and description of the property
received for sale;

(2) The name of the person from whom, or on account
of whom the same is received;

(3) The date upon which the same is received;

(4) The date upon which the same is sold;

(5) The price for which each article is sold;

(6) The name of the person to whom each article is
sold;

which record shall, during the regular business
hours be open to the inspection of any person desiring to see the same. Every
such entry shall be made immediately after each transaction required to be
recorded. [L 1896, c 64, §27; RL 1925, §1978; RL 1935, §2425; RL 1945, §7027;
RL 1955, §155-27; HRS §445-30]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next